Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF290.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2408XS (3) 91 th/ns S.F. 290 Section 1. Section 327C.37, Code 2025, is amended by 1 striking the section and inserting in lieu thereof the 2 following: 3 327C.37 Accidents resulting in personal injury or death ââ 4 investigations ââ reports ââ confidentiality. 5 1. If an accident occurs on any railroad within this 6 state that results in personal injury or death, the railway 7 corporation operating the railroad shall immediately notify 8 the department. If the department deems it necessary, the 9 department shall conduct an investigation and submit a 10 report to the governor detailing the extent of the injuries 11 and any fatalities, and whether the accident was caused by 12 mismanagement or neglect on the part of the railway corporation 13 operating the railroad. This report is not subject to chapter 14 22, including disclosure as described in section 22.7, and 15 shall not be admissible as evidence or referenced in any 16 proceeding in any court. 17 2. In the event of an accident resulting in the death of 18 a train crew member, personal information of a train crew 19 member who died is confidential and shall not be released 20 to the public, including personal information contained 21 in any report regarding the accident or contained in any 22 communication between law enforcement officers and train crew 23 members involved in such an accident. A law enforcement agency 24 and any person in subsequent possession of such personal 25 information shall maintain the personal information in a 26 manner that ensures the confidentiality and privacy of the 27 personal information. An unredacted report including personal 28 information of a train crew member who died may be accessed 29 upon written or electronic request by any of the following: 30 a. The railway corporation operating the railroad. 31 b. The railway corporation operating the train involved in 32 the accident. 33 c. A person authorized by court order. 34 d. A law enforcement officer, if necessary for the officerâs 35 -1- LSB 2408XS (3) 91 th/ns 1/ 2 S.F. 290 official duties. 1